Maine, session 132, LD577.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6602-A is enacted to read:
§6602-A. Free Milk Fund
1. Fund established. The Free Milk Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is
established in the department to issue grants to eligible school administrative units to
reimburse the cost of providing milk at no cost to students who do not receive a lunch
through a school food service program established in section 6602. The fund consists of
money received as appropriations, allocations and contributions from public and private
sources. The fund must be held separate and apart from all other money, funds and
accounts. Interest earned by the fund must be credited to the fund. Any unexpended
balances remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year do not lapse and must be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
For the purposes of this section, "eligible school administrative unit" means a school
administrative unit that participates in the National School Lunch Program under 7 Code
of Federal Regulations, Part 210 and that meets federal compliance requirements
established by that program.
2. Rules. The department shall adopt routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A to carry out the purposes of the fund.